Utah statutes.
49-12-404.   Lump-sum death benefit for retiree and spouse.
(1) (a)  Upon retirement, a retiree may elect to have the office deduct an
actuarially determined amount from the retiree's allowance to provide a lump-
sum benefit payable to a beneficiary upon the death of the retiree.
(b)  Upon retirement, a retiree may also elect to have an actuarially
determined amount deducted from the retiree's allowance to provide a lump-sum
death benefit payable to a beneficiary upon the death of the retiree's lawful
spouse at the time of retirement.
(c)  The board may make rules for the administration of this lump-sum death
benefit.
(2) (a)  For a retiree who pays for a lump-sum death benefit under this
section through a reduction of an allowance, benefits shall be paid in
accordance with Sections 49-11-609 and 49-11-610.
(b)  If the retiree chooses Option Three, Four, Five, or Six, and a lump-sum
death benefit is payable after the death of the retiree, the allowance shall
be restored to its original amount.
(3) (a)  A retiree whose retirement date is on or after July 1, 1995, may
elect to cancel the lump-sum death benefit under this section.
(b)  The cancellation under this Subsection (3) is irrevocable.
(c)  Upon cancellation, the allowance shall be restored to its original amount
and benefits under this section may not be paid.
